Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-322
Nongame fish; removal by commission; game fish; return to water alive.

In water where nongame fish abound, the commission may remove or cause to be removed by written agreement such nongame fish for fish management purposes and may sell such nongame fish. The proceeds from such sales shall be paid into the State Game Fund. Game fish protected by the Game Law, taken by such methods, shall be immediately returned alive and with as little injury as possible to the waters from which they were taken.

Laws 1929, c. 112, V, § 4, p. 427;

C.S.1929, § 37-504;

R.S.1943, § 37-504;

Laws 1967, c. 216, § 11, p. 587;

Laws 1989, LB 34, § 27;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-504;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 80.